Utah statutes.
70A-4a-104.   Funds transfer -- Definitions.
(1)  "Funds transfer" means the series of transactions, beginning with the
originator's payment order, made for the purpose of making payment to the
beneficiary of the order.  The term includes any payment order issued by the
originator's bank or an intermediary bank intended to carry out the
originator's payment order.  A funds transfer is completed by acceptance by
the beneficiary's bank of a payment order for the benefit of the beneficiary
of the originator's payment order.
(2)  "Intermediary bank" means a receiving bank other than the originator's
bank or the beneficiary's bank.
(3)  "Originator" means the sender of the first payment order in a funds
transfer.
(4)  "Originator's bank" means:
(a)  the receiving bank to which the payment order of the originator is issued
if the originator is not a bank; or
(b)  the originator if the originator is a bank.
